Nebraska, session 109, LB201.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB201 LB201
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 8-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2701 Sections 8-2701 to 8-2747 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 2. (1) A licensee or authorized delegate shall collect a fee
for each money transmission transaction sent to a person outside the
United States. The fee shall be in an amount equal to (a) ten percent of
the value of the money transmission transaction or (b) ten thousand
dollars, whichever is less.
(2) The fee required by subsection (1) of this section shall be
remitted quarterly to the department with a form prescribed by the
department with the assistance of the Nebraska State Patrol. All fees and
forms shall be remitted to the department not later than the fifteenth
day of the month following the close of each calendar quarter.
Sec. 3. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. Original section 8-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-